Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5028.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; KLAMATH TRAIL RETAINING WALLS.new text end new text begin $1,750,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to the city of Lakeville to predesign, design, and construct the replacement of two retaining walls along the south side of Klamath Trail, east and west of Kings Court, in the city of Lakeville. This project includes site and associated site support area preparation, including demolition of the two current retaining walls. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end